Hawaii statutes.
§211F-3 Board of directors; composition.
(a) The governing body of the corporation shall be a board of directors
consisting of twelve members to be appointed by the governor for staggered
terms pursuant to section 26-34 as follows:

(1) Three to be appointed directly by the governor;

(2) Three to be appointed from a list of nominees
from the general public submitted by the president of the senate; and

(3) Three to be appointed from a list of nominees
from the general public submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives,

and shall be selected on the basis of their
knowledge, skill, and experience in the scientific, business, or financial
fields. The director of business, economic development, and tourism, a member
from the board of the high technology development corporation appointed by the
governor, and a member from the board of the natural energy laboratory of
Hawaii authority appointed by the governor, or their designated
representatives, shall serve as ex officio[,] voting members. Not more than
two of the six members of the board appointed from the lists of nominees
submitted by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives, during their term of office on the board, shall be employees
of the State. All appointed members of the board shall continue in office
until their respective successors have been appointed.

(b) The director of business, economic
development, and tourism shall serve as chairperson of the board until such
time as a chairperson is elected by the board from the membership. The board
shall elect such other officers as it deems necessary.

(c) The members of the board shall serve
without compensation, but may be reimbursed for expenses, including travel
expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties.

(d) The board shall appoint a president of the
corporation who shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall be exempt
from chapter 76. The board shall set the salary and duties of the president.

(e) A board member shall not participate in
any corporation decision to invest in, purchase from, sell to, borrow from,
loan to, contract with, or otherwise deal with any person with whom or entity
in which the board member has a substantial financial interest.

(f) The board may delegate to its president,
staff, or others those functions and powers that the board deems necessary or
appropriate, including but not limited to the oversight and supervision of
employees of the corporation. [L 1990, c 110, pt of §3; am L 1992, c 121, §1; am
L 2000, c 253, §150 and c 297, §30; am L 2004, c 215, §4]

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (a) cited, as a constitutional board and
commission statute where members may serve as holdovers until their successors
are "appointed", without any reference to the successors being fully
"qualified"; an "appointment" properly occurs under the
interim appointments provision of article V, §6 of the state constitution.
Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next